Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 50 The Rhode Island Fair Dealership Act

6-50-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Rhode Island Fair Dealership Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 28, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 36, § 1.

6-50-2.
Definitions.

In this chapter:

“Community of interest” means a continuing financial interest between the grantor and the grantee in either the operation of the dealership business or the marketing of such goods or services;

“Dealer” means a person who is a grantee of a dealership situated in this state;

“Dealership” means any of the following:

A contract or agreement, either expressed or implied, whether oral or written, between two (2) or more persons, by which a person is granted the right to sell or distribute goods or services, or use a trade name, trademark, service mark, logotype, advertising, or other commercial symbol, in which there is a community of interest in the business of offering, selling, or distributing goods or services at wholesale, retail, by lease, agreement, or otherwise.

“Good cause” means, for the purposes of this act, good cause for terminating, canceling, or nonrenewal and shall include, but not be limited to, failure by the dealer to comply with the reasonable requirements imposed by the grantor or any of the reasons listed in § 6-50-4(a)(1) — (a)(6).

“Grantor” means a person who grants a dealership;

“Person” means a natural person, partnership, joint venture, corporation, or other entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 28, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 36, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 347, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 373, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 37.

6-50-3.
Purposes — Rules of construction — Variation by contract.

This chapter shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying remedial purposes and policies.

The underlying purposes and policies of this chapter are:

To promote the compelling interest of the public in fair business relations between dealers and grantors and in the continuation of dealerships on a fair basis;

To protect dealers against unfair treatment by grantors;

To provide dealers with rights and remedies in addition to those existing by contract or common law;

To govern dealerships, including any renewals or amendments, to the full extent consistent with the constitutions of this state and the United States.

The effect of this chapter may not be varied by contract or agreement. Any contract or agreement purporting to do so is void and unenforceable to that extent only.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 28, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 36, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 347, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 373, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 37.

6-50-4.
Notice of termination or change in dealership.

Notwithstanding the terms, provisions, or conditions of any agreement to the contrary, a grantor shall provide a dealer sixty (60) days prior, written notice of termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal. The notice shall state all the reasons for termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal and shall provide that the dealer has thirty (30) days in which to cure any claimed deficiency; provided that a dealer has a right to cure three (3) times in any twelve-month (12) period during the period of the dealership agreement. The sixty-day (60) notice provisions of this section shall not apply and the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal may be made effective immediately upon written notice if the reason for termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal is in the event the dealer: (1) Voluntarily abandons the dealership relationship; (2) Is convicted of a felony offense related to the business conducted pursuant to the dealership; (3) Engages in any substantial act that tends to materially impair the goodwill of the grantor’s trade name, trademark, service mark, logotype, or other commercial symbol; (4) Makes a material misrepresentation of fact to the grantor relating to the dealership; (5) Attempts to transfer the dealership (or a portion thereof) without authorization of the grantor; or (6) Is insolvent, files, or suffers to be filed against it, any voluntary or involuntary bankruptcy petition or makes an assignment for the benefit of creditors or similar disposition of assets of the dealer business.

If the reason for termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal is nonpayment of sums due under the dealership, the dealers shall be entitled to written notice of such default and shall have ten (10) days in which to cure such default from the date of such notice. A dealer has the right to cure three (3) times in any twelve-month (12) period during the period of the dealership agreement.

If the reason for termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal is for violation of any law, regulation, or standard relating to public health or safety, the dealer shall be entitled to immediate, written notice and shall have twenty-four (24) hours to cure such violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 28, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 36, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 347, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 373, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 37.

6-50-5.
Repurchase of inventories.

If a dealership is terminated by the grantor, the grantor, at the option of the dealer, shall repurchase all inventories sold by the grantor to the dealer for resale under the dealership agreement at the fair, wholesale market value. This section applies only to merchandise with a name, trademark, label, or other mark on it which identifies the grantor.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 28, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 36, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 37.

6-50-6.
Application to arbitration agreements.

This chapter shall not apply to provisions for the binding arbitration of disputes contained in a dealership agreement if the criteria for determining whether good cause existed for a termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal and the relief provided is no less than that provided for in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 28, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 36, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 347, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 373, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 37.

6-50-7.
Action for damages and injunctive relief.

If any grantor violates this chapter, a dealer may bring an action against such grantor in any court of competent jurisdiction for damages sustained by the dealer as a consequence of the grantor’s violation, together with the actual costs of the action, including reasonable, actual attorneys’ fees. The dealer also may be granted injunctive relief against unlawful termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 28, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 36, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 347, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 373, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 37.

6-50-8.
Temporary injunctions.

In any action brought by a dealer against a grantor under this chapter, any violation of this chapter by the grantor is deemed an irreparable injury to the dealer in determining if temporary injunctions should issue.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 28, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 36, § 1.

6-50-9.
Nonapplicability.

This chapter shall not apply to malt beverage dealerships; motor vehicle dealerships; insurance agency relationships; any relationship relating to the sale or administration of insurance or any similar contract with an entity organized under chapters 19 or 20 of title 27; fuel distribution dealerships; and door-to-door sales dealerships.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 28, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 36, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 347, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 373, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 37.